District of Columbia statutes.
7-1541.04

Penalties; prosecutions.

(a)

Any person violating any provision of this subchapter and the amendments to §§ 43-119 and 43-125, or any regulation made pursuant to this subchapter and the amendments to §§ 43-119 and 43-125, shall be fined not more than $300, or be imprisoned for not more than 90 days. Prosecution for violations of this subchapter and the amendments to §§ 43-119 and 43-125 and regulations made pursuant thereto shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Sept. 10, 1962, 76 Stat. 535, Pub. L. 87-656, § 5
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 430, 32 DCR 4450
1981 Ed., § 2-1604.
1973 Ed., § 2-254.